Hawaii statutes.
§46‑14.5 Land use density and
infrastructure; low-income rental units. Notwithstanding any other law to
the contrary, the counties are authorized to provide flexibility in land use
density provisions and public facility requirements to encourage the development
of any rental housing project where at least a portion of the rental units are
set aside for persons and families with incomes at or below one hundred forty
per cent of the area median family income, of which twenty per cent are set
aside for persons and families with incomes at or below eighty per cent of the
area median family income. [L 2005, c 196, §3; am L 2006, c 217, §2]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next